Maryland, session 2026, SB0806.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
1A–302.
(a) To qualify for a license, an applicant shall be an individual who meets the
requirements of this section.
(b) The applicant shall:
(4) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 1A–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
[(4)] (5) Demonstrate the ability to communicate in the English
language; and
[(5)] (6) Meet any other qualifications that the Board establishes in
regulations.
1A–302.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CENTRAL REPOSITORY” MEANS THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM CENTRAL REPOSITORY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES.
(B) AN APPLICANT SHALL APPLY TO THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY FOR A
STATE AND NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK.
(C) AS PART OF THE APPLICATION FOR A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
CHECK, AN APPLICANT SHALL COMPLETE AND SUBMIT TO THE CENTRAL
REPOSITORY:
(1) A COMPLETE SET OF LEGIBLE FINGERPRINTS TAKEN IN A FORMAT
APPROVED BY THE DIRECTOR OF THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AND THE DIRECTOR
OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(2) THE FEE AUTHORIZED UNDER § 10–221(B)(7) OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE FOR ACCESS TO MARYLAND CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS;
AND
(3) THE MANDATORY PROCESSING FEE REQUIRED BY THE FEDERAL
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR A NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK.
(D) IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 10–201 THROUGH 10–229 OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL FORWARD TO THE
BOARD AND THE INDIVIDUAL THE INDIVIDUAL’S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION.
(E) INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY UNDER
THIS SECTION:
(1) IS CONFIDENTIAL;
(2) MAY NOT BE REDISSEMINATED; AND
(3) MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE LICENSING PURPOSE AUTHORIZED
BY THIS TITLE.
(F) THE SUBJECT OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY CONTEST THE CONTENTS OF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION ISSUED BY THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AS PROVIDED IN § 10–223 OF
THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(G) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO THE
CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
1A–306.
(c) Before the license expires, the licensee periodically may renew it for an
additional term, if the licensee:
(1) Otherwise is entitled to be licensed;
(2) Pays to the Board a renewal fee set by the Board; and
(3) Submits to the Board:
– 3 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) A renewal application on the form that the Board requires; [and]
(ii) Satisfactory evidence of compliance with any continuing
education requirements set under this section for license renewal; AND
(III) FOR INDIVIDUALS LICENSED BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2028,
SATISFACTORY EVIDENCE OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 1A–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR THE LICENSEE’S FIRST
RENEWAL AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028.
1A–307.
(c) The Board may reinstate the license of a former licensee who has failed to
renew the license for any reason if the former licensee:
(1) Meets the continuing education requirements of § 1A–306 of this
subtitle for each year that the license has lapsed;
(2) Applies for reinstatement more than 30 days after the license renewal
deadline;
(3) Submits to the Board an application for reinstatement on the form
required by the Board; [and]
(4) Pays to the Board a reinstatement fee and a renewal fee set by the
Board; AND
(5) SUBMITS TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 1A–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
4–302.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this title, to qualify for a license, an applicant
shall be an individual who meets the requirements of this section.
(b) The applicant shall be of good moral character.
(c) To qualify for a license to practice dentistry, the applicant shall be at least 18
years old.
(D) THE APPLICANT SHALL SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–302.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(d)] (E) Unless waived by the Board under §§ 4–303 and 4–303.1 of this subtitle,
and except as provided in § 4–306.1 of this subtitle, to qualify for a license to practice
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
dentistry, the applicant shall hold a degree of Doctor of Dental Surgery, Doctor of Dental
Medicine, or the equivalent, from a college or university that is:
(1) Authorized by any state or any province of Canada to grant the degree;
and
(2) Recognized by the Board as requiring adequate preprofessional
collegiate training and as maintaining an acceptable course of dental instruction.
[(e)] (F) To qualify for a license to practice dental hygiene, the applicant shall
be a graduate of a school for dental hygienists that:
(1) Requires at least 2 years of education in an institution of higher
education;
(2) Is accredited by the American Dental Association Commission on
Dental Accreditation; and
(3) Is approved by the Board.
[(f)] (G) (1) Unless the examination requirement is waived under § 4–306 or
§ 4–310 of this subtitle, and except as provided in § 4–303.1 of this subtitle, to qualify for a
general license to practice dentistry or a general license to practice dental hygiene, the
applicant shall pass an examination given by the Board under this subtitle.
(2) An examination is not required for a teacher’s license to practice
dentistry, a limited license to practice dentistry, or a teacher’s license to practice dental
hygiene.
[(g)] (H) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), (b), (c), [and] (d),
AND (E) of this section, to qualify for a teacher’s license to practice dentistry, the applicant
shall:
(1) Be licensed to practice dentistry in any other state;
(2) Have been active in the dental profession for at least 5 years;
(3) Be a full–time or part–time faculty member at a college or university
where the applicant teaches a subject required by the dental school of that college or
university; and
(4) If the applicant is engaged in a teaching area that is designated as a
specialty by the National Commission on Recognition of Dental Specialties and Certifying
Boards, meet the requirements established by the National Commission on Recognition of
Dental Specialties and Certifying Boards for that specialty.
– 5 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(h)] (I) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), (b), [and (e)] (D),
AND (F) of this section, to qualify for a teacher’s license to practice dental hygiene, the
applicant shall:
(1) Be licensed to practice dental hygiene in any other state;
(2) Have been active as a dental hygienist for at least 5 years before
applying for the teacher’s license to practice dental hygiene; and
(3) Be a full–time or part–time faculty member at a dental school where
the applicant teaches a subject required by that school.
[(i)] (J) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), (b), (c), [and] (d),
AND (E) of this section, to qualify for a retired volunteer dentist’s license to practice
dentistry, the applicant shall:
(1) Have had a general license to practice dentistry issued under this title
within the last 2 years;
(2) Complete the continuing education requirements that the Board
establishes for a general license; and
(3) Provide dental services as required under § 4–308(c) of this subtitle.
[(j)] (K) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), (b), [and (e)] (D),
AND (F) of this section, to qualify for a retired dental hygienist’s license to practice dental
hygiene, the applicant shall:
(1) Have had a general license to practice dental hygiene under this title
within the last 2 years;
(2) Complete the continuing education requirements that the Board
establishes for a general license; and
(3) Provide dental hygiene services as required under § 4–308(g) of this
subtitle.
[(k)] (L) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), (b), (c), [and] (d),
AND (E) of this section, to qualify for a volunteer dentist’s license to practice dentistry, the
applicant shall:
(1) Satisfy the requirements of § 4–306(b)(1) and (d)(2) of this subtitle;
(2) Hold an active license to practice dentistry in another state or in the
District of Columbia;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(3) Complete the continuing education requirements that the Board
establishes for a general license;
(4) Provide dental services exclusively in the manner described in §
4–308(c) of this subtitle; and
(5) Immediately upon ceasing to provide services exclusively in the manner
described in § 4–308(c) of this subtitle, surrender the volunteer license to the Board.
[(l)] (M) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a), (b), (c), (D), and [(e)]
(F) of this section, to qualify for a volunteer dental hygienist’s license to practice dental
hygiene, an applicant shall:
(1) Satisfy the requirements of § 4–306(b)(2) and (e)(2) of this subtitle;
(2) Hold an active license to practice dental hygiene in another state or in
the District of Columbia;
(3) Complete the continuing education requirements that the Board
establishes for a general license;
(4) Provide dental hygiene services exclusively in the manner described in
§ 4–308(g) of this subtitle; and
(5) Immediately upon ceasing to provide services exclusively in the manner
described in § 4–308(g) of this subtitle, surrender the volunteer license to the Board.
[(m)] (N) To qualify for a limited license to practice dentistry, the applicant shall
meet the requirements set forth in subsections (a), (b), (c), [and] (d), AND (E) of this section.
4–302.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CENTRAL REPOSITORY” MEANS THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM CENTRAL REPOSITORY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES.
(B) AN APPLICANT SHALL APPLY TO THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY FOR A
STATE AND NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK.
(C) AS PART OF THE APPLICATION FOR A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
CHECK, AN APPLICANT SHALL COMPLETE AND SUBMIT TO THE CENTRAL
REPOSITORY:
– 7 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) A COMPLETE SET OF LEGIBLE FINGERPRINTS TAKEN IN A FORMAT
APPROVED BY THE DIRECTOR OF THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AND THE DIRECTOR
OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION;
(2) THE FEE AUTHORIZED UNDER § 10–221(B)(7) OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE FOR ACCESS TO MARYLAND CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS;
AND
(3) THE MANDATORY PROCESSING FEE REQUIRED BY THE FEDERAL
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR A NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK.
(D) IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 10–201 THROUGH 10–229 OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL FORWARD TO THE
BOARD AND THE INDIVIDUAL THE INDIVIDUAL’S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION.
(E) INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY UNDER
THIS SECTION:
(1) IS CONFIDENTIAL;
(2) MAY NOT BE REDISSEMINATED; AND
(3) MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE LICENSING PURPOSE AUTHORIZED
BY THIS TITLE.
(F) THE SUBJECT OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY CONTEST THE CONTENTS OF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION ISSUED BY THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AS PROVIDED IN § 10–223 OF
THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(G) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO THE
CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
(H) ON RECEIPT OF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION OF AN
APPLICANT FOR LICENSURE OR CERTIFICATION FORWARDED TO THE BOARD IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION, IN DETERMINING WHETHER TO GRANT A
LICENSE OR CERTIFICATE, THE BOARD SHALL CONSIDER:
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(1) THE AGE AT WHICH THE CRIME WAS COMMITTED;
(2) THE CIRCUMSTANCES SURROUNDING THE CRIME;
(3) THE LENGTH OF TIME THAT HAS PASSED SINCE THE CRIME;
(4) SUBSEQUENT WORK HISTORY;
(5) EMPLOYMENT AND CHARACTER REFERENCES; AND
(6) OTHER EVIDENCE THAT DEMONSTRATES WHETHER THE
APPLICANT POSES A THREAT TO THE PUBLIC HEALTH OR SAFETY.
4–304.
(a) To apply for a license, an applicant shall:
(1) Submit an application to the Board on the form that the Board requires;
[and]
(2) SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–302.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) Pay to the Board an application fee set by the Board.
4–307.
(D) THE BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE A LICENSE IF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORD INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER § 4–302.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE HAS NOT
BEEN RECEIVED.
4–310.
(D) THE BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE A LICENSE IF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORD INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER § 4–302.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE HAS NOT
BEEN RECEIVED.
4–311.
(A) The Board shall reinstate a general license to practice dentistry, a teacher’s
license to practice dentistry, a general license to practice dental hygiene, or a teacher’s
license to practice dental hygiene that is expired only if the licensee:
– 9 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) Meets the renewal and reinstatement requirements set by rule and
regulation of the Board; and
(2) Pays to the Board a reinstatement fee set by the Board.
(B) (1) BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE BOARD SHALL REQUIRE A
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–302.2 OF THIS
SUBTITLE FOR:
(I) LICENSE RENEWAL APPLICANTS AS DETERMINED BY
REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE BOARD; AND
(II) EACH FORMER LICENSEE WHO FILES FOR REINSTATEMENT
AFTER FAILING TO RENEW A LICENSE.
(2) THE BOARD MAY NOT RENEW OR REINSTATE A LICENSE IF THE
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER § 4–302.2 OF THIS
SUBTITLE HAS NOT BEEN RECEIVED.
4–315.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 4–318 of this subtitle, the Board may
deny a general license to practice dentistry, a limited license to practice dentistry, or a
teacher’s license to practice dentistry to any applicant, reprimand any licensed dentist,
place any licensed dentist on probation, or suspend or revoke the license of any licensed
dentist, if the applicant or licensee:
(37) Accepts or tenders rebates or splits fees in violation of § 4–103(c) of this
title; [or]
(38) Allows a dental assistant to assist in the practice of dentistry:
(i) In an unauthorized manner in violation of this title or
regulations adopted by the Board;
(ii) Without specifically instructing the certified dental assistant to
perform an intraoral procedure that the certified dental assistant is authorized to perform;
or
(iii) Failing to provide direct supervision of a dental assistant; OR
(39) FAILS TO SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–302.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(c) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 4–318 of this subtitle, the Board may
deny a general license to practice dental hygiene, a teacher’s license to practice dental
hygiene, or a temporary license to practice dental hygiene to any applicant, reprimand any
licensed dental hygienist, place any licensed dental hygienist on probation, or suspend or
revoke the license of any licensed dental hygienist, if the applicant or licensee:
(19) Fails to comply with any Board order; [or]
(20) Willfully and without legal justification, fails to cooperate with a lawful
investigation conducted by the Board; OR
(21) FAILS TO SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–302.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
4–505.
(E) AN APPLICANT FOR A CERTIFICATE TO PRACTICE AS A DENTAL
RADIATION TECHNOLOGIST SHALL SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–302.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(e)] (F) At least 1 month before a certificate expires, the Board shall send to
each certificate holder, by electronic means or first–class mail to the last known electronic
or physical address of the certificate holder, a renewal notice that states:
(1) The date on which the current certificate expires;
(2) The date by which the renewal application must be received by the
Board for the renewal to be issued and mailed before the certificate expires; and
(3) The amount of the renewal fee.
[(f)] (G) An individual may be simultaneously certified as a dental radiation
technologist under this section and as an expanded function dental assistant.
(H) (1) BEGINNING OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE BOARD SHALL REQUIRE A
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–302.2 OF THIS
SUBTITLE FOR:
(I) CERTIFICATE RENEWAL APPLICANTS AS DETERMINED BY
REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE BOARD; AND
(II) EACH FORMER CERTIFICATE HOLDER WHO FILES FOR
REINSTATEMENT AFTER FAILING TO RENEW A CERTIFICATE.
– 11 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) THE BOARD MAY NOT RENEW OR REINSTATE A CERTIFICATE IF
THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER § 4–302.2 OF
THIS SUBTITLE HAS NOT BEEN RECEIVED.
5–302.
(d) The applicant for licensure as a dietitian–nutritionist shall:
(1) (i) 1. Have satisfactorily completed academic requirements for
the field of dietetics as approved by the Board; and
2. Have received at a minimum a baccalaureate degree from
a college or university accredited by an educational accrediting association as required by
the Commission on Dietetic Registration; or
(ii) Have received a master’s or doctoral degree from a college or
university accredited by an educational accrediting association recognized by the Council
on Higher Education and Accreditation in nutritional sciences (with emphasis in human
nutrition), food and nutrition, dietetics, human nutrition, community nutrition, public
health nutrition, or equivalent training approved by the Board;
(2) Have satisfactorily completed a program of supervised clinical
experience approved by the Board; [and]
(3) (i) Submit to the Board proof of certification by the Board for
Certification of Nutrition Specialists; or
(ii) Submit to the Board proof of registration as a dietitian with the
Commission on Dietetic Registration of the Academy of Nutrition and Dietetics; AND
(4) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
5–302.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CENTRAL REPOSITORY” MEANS THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM CENTRAL REPOSITORY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES.
(B) AN APPLICANT SHALL APPLY TO THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY FOR A
STATE AND NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(C) AS PART OF THE APPLICATION FOR A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
CHECK, AN APPLICANT SHALL COMPLETE AND SUBMIT TO THE CENTRAL
REPOSITORY:
(1) A COMPLETE SET OF LEGIBLE FINGERPRINTS TAKEN IN A FORMAT
APPROVED BY THE DIRECTOR OF THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AND THE DIRECTOR
OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION;
(2) THE FEE AUTHORIZED UNDER § 10–221(B)(7) OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE FOR ACCESS TO MARYLAND CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS;
AND
(3) THE MANDATORY PROCESSING FEE REQUIRED BY THE FEDERAL
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR A NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK.
(D) IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 10–201 THROUGH 10–229 OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL FORWARD TO THE
BOARD AND THE INDIVIDUAL THE INDIVIDUAL’S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION.
(E) INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY UNDER
THIS SECTION:
(1) IS CONFIDENTIAL;
(2) MAY NOT BE REDISSEMINATED; AND
(3) MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE LICENSING PURPOSE AUTHORIZED
BY THIS TITLE.
(F) THE SUBJECT OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY CONTEST THE CONTENTS OF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION ISSUED BY THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AS PROVIDED IN § 10–223 OF
THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(G) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO THE
CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
5–303.
– 13 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) An applicant for a license shall:
(1) Submit an application to the Board on the form that the Board requires;
(2) Pay the application fee set by the Board; [and]
(3) Provide proof of passing an examination approved by the Board; AND
(4) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
5–308.
(F) AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, SHALL PROVIDE
SATISFACTORY EVIDENCE OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–302.1 OF THIS TITLE FOR THE LICENSEE’S FIRST RENEWAL
AFTER JANUARY 1, 2028.
5–309.
(a) (1) The Board shall place a licensee on inactive status if the licensee:
(i) Submits to the Board an application for inactive status on the
form required by the Board; and
(ii) Pays to the Board the inactive status fee set by the Board.
(2) The Board shall reactivate the license of an individual placed on
inactive status if the individual:
(i) Satisfies the continuing education requirements established by
the Board; [and]
(ii) Pays to the Board a reactivation fee set by the Board; AND
(III) SUBMITS TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) The Board, in accordance with its regulations, shall reinstate the license of an
individual who failed to renew a license for any reason if the individual:
(1) Otherwise is entitled to be licensed;
(2) Satisfies the continuing education requirements established by the
Board;
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(3) Pays to the Board a reinstatement fee set by the Board; [and]
(4) Applies to the Board for reinstatement of a license within 5 years after
the expiration of the license; AND
(5) SUBMITS TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
5–311.
Subject to the hearing provisions of § 5–312 of this subtitle, the Board, on the
affirmative vote of a majority of its members then serving, may deny a license to any
applicant, reprimand any licensee, or suspend or revoke a license if the applicant or
licensee:
(1) Fraudulently or deceptively obtains or attempts to obtain a license for
the applicant or licensee or for another;
(2) Fraudulently or deceptively uses a license;
(3) Violates any provision of this title or any regulations adopted under this
title;
(4) Refuses, withholds from, denies, or discriminates against an individual
with regard to the provision of professional service for which the licensee is licensed and
qualified to render because the individual is HIV positive;
(5) Commits fraud or deceit in the practice of dietetics;
(6) Is convicted of or pleads nolo contendere to a felony or to a crime
involving moral turpitude, whether or not any appeal or other proceeding is pending to
have the conviction or plea set aside;
(7) Obtains or attempts to obtain a fee through fraud or misrepresentation;
(8) Employs any [person] INDIVIDUAL to practice dietetics whose license
or certificate to practice a health occupation under this article has been suspended;
(9) Uses or promotes or causes the use of any misleading, deceiving, or
untruthful advertising matter, or promotional literature, testimonial, guarantee, warranty,
label, brand, insignia, or other representation;
(10) Commits any act of unprofessional conduct, as defined by the rules and
regulations of the Board, or violates the code of ethics adopted by the Board;
– 15 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(11) Provides professional services while:
(i) Under the influence of alcohol; or
(ii) Using any narcotic or controlled dangerous substance, as defined
in § 5–101 of the Criminal Law Article, or other drug that is in excess of therapeutic
amounts or without valid medical indication;
(12) Is disciplined by a licensing or disciplinary authority of any other state
or country or convicted or disciplined by a court of any other state or country for an act that
would be grounds for disciplinary action under this section;
(13) Practices dietetics with an unauthorized [person] INDIVIDUAL or
supervises or aids an unauthorized [person] INDIVIDUAL in the practice of dietetics;
(14) Fails to file or record any report or record as required by law in the
practice of dietetics, impedes or obstructs the filing or recording of the report or record, or
induces another to fail to file or record the report or record;
(15) Submits a false statement to collect a fee;
(16) Is professionally, physically, or mentally incompetent;
(17) Promotes the sale of devices, appliances, or goods to a patient so as to
exploit the patient for financial gain; [or]
(18) Fails to cooperate with a lawful investigation conducted by the Board;
OR
(19) FAILS TO SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 5–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
7–301.1.
(c) (1) In this subsection, “Central Repository” means the Criminal Justice
Information System Central Repository of the Department of Public Safety and
Correctional Services.
(2) As part of an application to the Central Repository for a State and
national criminal history records check, an applicant shall submit to the Central
Repository:
(i) A complete set of legible fingerprints taken [on forms] IN A
FORMAT approved by the Director of the Central Repository and the Director of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation;
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(ii) The fee authorized under § 10–221(b)(7) of the Criminal
Procedure Article for access to [State] MARYLAND criminal history records; and
(iii) The MANDATORY processing fee required by the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for a national criminal history records check.
(3) In accordance with §§ 10–201 through [10–228] 10–229 of the Criminal
Procedure Article, the Central Repository shall forward to the Board and the applicant the
criminal history record information of the applicant.
(4) INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) IS CONFIDENTIAL;
(II) MAY NOT BE REDISSEMINATED; AND
(III) MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE LICENSING PURPOSE
AUTHORIZED BY THIS TITLE.
[(4)] (5) If an applicant has made three or more unsuccessful attempts at
securing legible fingerprints, the Board may accept an alternate method of a criminal
history records check as allowed by the Director of the Central Repository and the Director
of the Federal Bureau of Investigation.
[(5)] (6) The subject of a criminal history records check under this section
may contest the contents of the printed statement issued by the Central Repository as
provided in § 10–223 of the Criminal Procedure Article.
(7) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO
THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
8–302.2.
THE BOARD SHALL REQUIRE A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–303 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR:
(1) APPLICANTS FOR CERTIFICATION AS A FORENSIC NURSE
EXAMINER;
– 17 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) APPLICANTS FOR CERTIFICATION AS A WORKERS’
COMPENSATION CASE MANAGER;
(3) SELECTED ANNUAL RENEWAL APPLICANTS FOR CERTIFICATION
AS A FORENSIC NURSE EXAMINER OR WORKERS’ COMPENSATION CASE MANAGER, AS
REQUIRED BY REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE BOARD; AND
(4) APPLICANTS FOR REINSTATEMENT AS A CERTIFIED FORENSIC
NURSE EXAMINER OR WORKERS’ COMPENSATION CASE MANAGER, IF THE
APPLICANT FILES FOR REINSTATEMENT AFTER FAILING TO RENEW THE
CERTIFICATION FOR A PERIOD OF 1 YEAR OR MORE.
8–303.
(a) In this section, “Central Repository” means the Criminal Justice Information
System Central Repository of the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services.
(b) As part of an application to the Central Repository for a State and national
criminal history records check, an applicant shall submit to the Central Repository:
(1) [Two complete sets] A COMPLETE SET of legible fingerprints taken [on
forms] IN A FORMAT approved by the Director of the Central Repository and the Director
of the Federal Bureau of Investigation;
(2) The fee authorized under § 10–221(b)(7) of the Criminal Procedure
Article for access to [State] MARYLAND criminal history records; and
(3) The MANDATORY processing fee required by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history records check.
(c) In accordance with §§ 10–201 through [10–228] 10–229 of the Criminal
Procedure Article, the Central Repository shall forward to the Board and to the applicant
the criminal history record information of the applicant.
(d) (1) If criminal history record information is reported to the Central
Repository after the date of the initial criminal history records check, the Central
Repository shall provide to the Board a revised printed statement of the individual’s State
criminal history record.
(2) The Board shall notify each applicant that:
(i) The applicant’s fingerprints will be retained by the Central
Repository; and
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(ii) All new and additional criminal information will be reported to
the Board.
(3) The Board may enter into an agreement with the Central Repository
and the Federal Bureau of Investigation to carry out this subsection.
(e) If an applicant has made two or more unsuccessful attempts at securing
legible fingerprints, the Board may accept an alternate method of criminal history records
check as permitted by the Director of the Central Repository and the Director of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation.
(f) Information obtained from the Central Repository under this section [shall
be]:
(1) [Confidential and may] IS CONFIDENTIAL;
(2) MAY not be redisseminated; and
[(2)] (3) [Used] MAY BE USED only for the licensing purpose authorized
by this title.
(g) The subject of a criminal history records check under this section may contest
the contents of the printed statement issued by the Central Repository as provided in §
10–223 of the Criminal Procedure Article.
8–6A–05.
(c) (1) An applicant for a certificate shall:
(i) Submit [an application to the Board on the form that the Board
requires] TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 8–303
OF THIS TITLE;
(II) SUBMIT TO THE BOARD:
1. AN APPLICATION TO THE BOARD ON THE FORM THAT
THE BOARD REQUIRES; AND
2. WRITTEN VERIFICATION THAT THE REQUIREMENT IN
ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS BEING OR HAS BEEN MET;
[(ii)] (III) Provide evidence, as required by the Board, of successful
completion of:
– 19 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
1. An approved nursing assistant training program or
approved acute care nursing assistant training program;
2. An approved dialysis technician training program;
3. An approved course in medication administration; or
4. A portion of an approved nursing education program that
the Board determines meets the requirements of an approved nursing assistant training
program or medication administration course;
[(iii)] (IV) Pay to the Board an application fee set by the Board;
[(iv)] (V) Be of good moral character;
[(v)] (VI) Be at least 16 years old to apply for certification as a
nursing assistant;
[(vi)] (VII) Be at least 18 years old to apply for certification as a
dialysis technician; and
[(vii)] (VIII) Be at least 18 years old to apply for certification as a
medication technician.
[(2) Subject to paragraph (1) of this subsection, an applicant for certification
as a certified nursing assistant or dialysis technician shall submit to the Board:
(i) A criminal history records check in accordance with § 8–303 of
this title and § 8–6A–08(k) of this subtitle; and
(ii) On the form required by the Board, written, verified evidence
that the requirement of item (i) of this paragraph is being met or has been met.]
[(3)] (2) (i) An applicant for certification as a certified nursing
assistant shall submit to the Board satisfactory evidence of passing a nursing assistant
competency evaluation.
(ii) An applicant who has completed an approved acute care nursing
assistant training program shall be deemed to have fulfilled the classroom and clinical
standards to sit for the nursing assistant competency evaluation.
[(4)] (3) An applicant for a certificate may not:
(i) Have committed any act or omission that would be grounds for
discipline or denial of certification under this subtitle; and
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(ii) Have a record of abuse, negligence, misappropriation of a
resident’s property, or any disciplinary action taken or pending in any other state or
territory of the United States against the certification of the nursing assistant or
medication technician in the state or territory.
[(5)] (4) Beginning October 1, 2025, a certified nursing assistant–II may
be certified as a certified nursing assistant–I by:
(i) Submitting an application to the Board on the form that the
Board requires; and
(ii) Providing satisfactory evidence of:
1. Successful completion of an approved nursing assistant
training program; and
2. Passing a nursing assistant competency evaluation.
8–6A–08.
(b) (1) At least 3 months before a certificate expires, the Board shall send a
renewal notice to the certificate holder by:
(i) First–class mail to the last known mailing address of the
certificate holder; or
(ii) Electronic means to the last known electronic address of the
certificate holder.
(2) A renewal notice shall state:
(i) The date on which the current certificate expires;
(ii) The date by which the renewal application must be received by
the Board for the renewal to be issued and mailed before the certificate expires; and
(iii) The amount of the renewal fee.
(3) If a [nursing assistant or dialysis technician] CERTIFICATE HOLDER
is required to have a criminal history records check before a certificate may be renewed,
the Board shall send the [nursing assistant or dialysis technician] CERTIFICATE HOLDER
the documents necessary for initiating the criminal history records check in conjunction
with the renewal notice required under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
– 21 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(l) (1) (i) The Board shall require criminal history records checks in
accordance with § 8–303 of this title on:
1. Selected applicants for certification as a certified nursing
assistant, MEDICATION TECHNICIAN, or dialysis technician who renew their certificates
every 2 years as determined by regulations adopted by the Board; and
2. Each former certified nursing assistant, MEDICATION
TECHNICIAN, or dialysis technician who files for reinstatement under subsection (h) of this
section after failing to renew the certificate for a period of 1 year or more.
(ii) An additional criminal history records check shall be performed
every 12 years thereafter.
11–308.
(D) (1) BEGINNING AUGUST 1, 2026, THE BOARD SHALL REQUIRE A
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–302.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE FOR:
(I) LICENSE RENEWAL APPLICANTS AS DETERMINED BY
REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE BOARD; AND
(II) EACH FORMER LICENSEE WHO FILES FOR REINSTATEMENT
AFTER FAILING TO RENEW A LICENSE.
(2) THE BOARD MAY NOT RENEW OR REINSTATE A LICENSE IF THE
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER § 11–302.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE HAS NOT BEEN RECEIVED.
[(d)] (E) The Board shall renew the license of and issue a renewal certificate to
each licensee who meets the requirements of this section.
[(e)] (F) If an optometrist does not renew a license before its expiration date, the
Board shall send to the optometrist a notice stating that the license will expire 30 days
after the notice is sent unless the optometrist applies for renewal within the grace period.
11–310.
(a) (1) The Board shall place a licensee on inactive status, if the licensee
submits to the Board:
(i) An application for inactive status on the form required by the
Board; and
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(ii) The inactive status fee set by the Board.
(2) The Board shall issue a license to an individual who is on inactive status
if the individual:
(i) Meets any continuing education requirements set by the Board;
[and]
(ii) Pays to the Board the reinstatement fee set by the Board; AND
(III) SUBMITS TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) The Board may reinstate the license of an optometrist whose license has been
expired for less than 5 years and who has not been put on inactive status, if the optometrist:
(1) Has met the continuing education requirements set by the Board;
(2) Meets the renewal requirements of § 11–308 of this subtitle; [and]
(3) Pays to the Board the reinstatement fee set by the Board; AND
(4) SUBMITS TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(c) The Board may not reinstate the license of an optometrist whose license has
been expired for 5 years or more and who has not been put on inactive status, unless the
optometrist:
(1) Passes [an] ALL PARTS OF ANY examination [administered]
REQUIRED by the Board; [and]
(2) SUBMITS TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 11–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
[(2)] (3) Otherwise meets the requirements of subsection (b) of this
section.
(D) THE BOARD MAY REACTIVATE A LICENSEE ON INACTIVE STATUS ONLY
IF THE LICENSEE ATTESTS THAT THE LICENSEE HAS SUBMITTED TO A CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORDS CHECK UNDER § 11–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
12–302.
– 23 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) THE APPLICANT SHALL SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(d)] (E) The applicant shall:
(1) Be a graduate of a school or college of pharmacy that is approved by the
Board or accredited by the American Council on Pharmaceutical Education; and
(2) Have completed the professional experience program that the Board
requires.
[(e)] (F) Except as otherwise provided in this title, the applicant shall pass an
examination given by the Board under this subtitle.
[(f)] (G) (1) In this subsection, “foreign school or college of pharmacy” means
a school or college of pharmacy that is not located in any state in the United States.
(2) The Board may waive the requirements of subsection [(d)(1)] (E)(1) of
this section for an applicant who is a graduate of a foreign school or college of pharmacy,
provided that the applicant passes an examination approved by the Board in addition to
the examinations otherwise given by the Board under this subtitle.
[(g)] (H) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the Board shall
require, as part of its examination or licensing procedures, an applicant for a license to
practice pharmacy to demonstrate an oral competency in the English language by passing
a Board approved standardized test of oral competency.
(2) The Board shall adopt regulations that establish a procedure for testing
an individual who because of the individual’s speech or hearing impairment is unable to
complete satisfactorily a Board approved standardized test of oral competency.
(3) If any disciplinary charge or action that relates to a problem with the
oral communication of the English language is brought against a licensee under this title,
the Board shall require the licensee to pass a Board approved standardized test of oral
competency.
(4) The Board may not require an applicant for a license to practice
pharmacy, who is or was previously licensed in another state to practice pharmacy, to
demonstrate an oral competency in the English language, if the other state’s examination
and licensing procedures at the time the applicant was licensed in the other state included
an oral competency component.
(5) Graduation from a recognized English–speaking professional school
accredited by the Accreditation Council for Pharmacy Education is acceptable as proof of
proficiency in the oral communication of the English language under this subsection.
– 24 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
12–302.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CENTRAL REPOSITORY” MEANS THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM CENTRAL REPOSITORY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES.
(B) AN APPLICANT SHALL APPLY TO THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY FOR A
STATE AND NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK.
(C) AS PART OF THE APPLICATION FOR A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
CHECK, AN APPLICANT SHALL COMPLETE AND SUBMIT TO THE CENTRAL
REPOSITORY:
(1) A COMPLETE SET OF LEGIBLE FINGERPRINTS TAKEN IN A FORMAT
APPROVED BY THE DIRECTOR OF THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AND THE DIRECTOR
OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION;
(2) THE FEE AUTHORIZED UNDER § 10–221(B)(7) OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE FOR ACCESS TO MARYLAND CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS;
AND
(3) THE MANDATORY PROCESSING FEE REQUIRED BY THE FEDERAL
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR A NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK.
(D) IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 10–201 THROUGH 10–229 OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL FORWARD TO THE
BOARD AND THE INDIVIDUAL THE INDIVIDUAL’S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION.
(E) INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY UNDER
THIS SECTION:
(1) IS CONFIDENTIAL;
(2) MAY NOT BE REDISSEMINATED; AND
(3) MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE LICENSING PURPOSE AUTHORIZED
BY THIS TITLE.
(F) THE SUBJECT OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY CONTEST THE CONTENTS OF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
– 25 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
INFORMATION ISSUED BY THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AS PROVIDED IN § 10–223 OF
THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(G) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO THE
CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
12–303.
(a) To apply for a license, an applicant shall:
(1) Submit an application to the Board on the form that the Board requires;
[and]
(2) Pay the application fees set by the Board; AND
(3) SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
12–306.
(A) The Board shall issue a license to any applicant who meets the requirements
of this title.
(B) (1) ON RECEIPT OF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION
OF AN APPLICANT FOR LICENSURE FORWARDED TO THE BOARD IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 12–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE, IN DETERMINING WHETHER TO GRANT A
LICENSE, THE BOARD SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) THE AGE AT WHICH THE CRIME WAS COMMITTED;
(II) THE CIRCUMSTANCES SURROUNDING THE CRIME;
(III) THE LENGTH OF TIME THAT HAS PASSED SINCE THE CRIME;
(IV) SUBSEQUENT WORK HISTORY;
(V) EMPLOYMENT AND CHARACTER REFERENCES; AND
(VI) OTHER EVIDENCE THAT DEMONSTRATES WHETHER THE
APPLICANT POSES A THREAT TO THE PUBLIC HEALTH OR SAFETY.
– 26 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(2) THE BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE A LICENSE IF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORD INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER § 12–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE HAS NOT
BEEN RECEIVED.
12–308.
(D) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THE BOARD SHALL REQUIRE ALL LICENSEES
WHO WERE INITIALLY LICENSED WITHOUT A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK
TO SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
12–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE ON RENEWAL AS SET FORTH IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED
BY THE BOARD.
[(d)] (E) The Board shall renew the license of and issue a renewal certificate to
each licensee who meets the requirements of this section.
12–310.
(b) The Board shall reinstate the license of a pharmacist whose license has been
expired for 2 years or more if the pharmacist:
(1) Meets the reinstatement requirements established by the Board in its
rules or regulations; [and]
(2) Satisfies the requirements of subsection (a) of this section; AND
(3) SUBMITS TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
12–6B–02.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CENTRAL REPOSITORY” MEANS THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM CENTRAL REPOSITORY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES.
(B) AN APPLICANT SHALL APPLY TO THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY FOR A
STATE AND NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK.
(C) AS PART OF THE APPLICATION FOR A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
CHECK, AN APPLICANT SHALL COMPLETE AND SUBMIT TO THE CENTRAL
REPOSITORY:
– 27 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) A COMPLETE SET OF LEGIBLE FINGERPRINTS TAKEN IN A FORMAT
APPROVED BY THE DIRECTOR OF THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AND THE DIRECTOR
OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION;
(2) THE FEE AUTHORIZED UNDER § 10–221(B)(7) OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE FOR ACCESS TO MARYLAND CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS;
AND
(3) THE MANDATORY PROCESSING FEE REQUIRED BY THE FEDERAL
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR A NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK.
(D) IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 10–201 THROUGH 10–229 OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL FORWARD TO THE
BOARD AND THE INDIVIDUAL THE INDIVIDUAL’S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION.
(E) INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY UNDER
THIS SECTION:
(1) IS CONFIDENTIAL;
(2) MAY NOT BE REDISSEMINATED; AND
(3) MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE LICENSING PURPOSE AUTHORIZED
BY THIS TITLE.
(F) THE SUBJECT OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY CONTEST THE CONTENTS OF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION ISSUED BY THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AS PROVIDED IN § 10–223 OF
THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(G) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO THE
CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
12–6C–05.1.
(a) (1) In this subsection, “Central Repository” means the Criminal Justice
Information System Central Repository of the Department of Public Safety and
Correctional Services.
– 28 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(2) This subsection applies to applicants located in the State.
(3) As part of an application to the Central Repository for a State and
national criminal history records check, the designated representative and the immediate
supervisor of the designated representative of an applicant shall submit to the Central
Repository:
(i) [Two complete sets] A COMPLETE SET of legible fingerprints
taken [on forms] IN A FORMAT approved by the [director] DIRECTOR of the Central
Repository and the Director of the Federal Bureau of Investigation;
(ii) The fee authorized under § 10–221(b)(7) of the Criminal
Procedure Article for access to [State] MARYLAND criminal history records; and
(iii) The MANDATORY processing fee required by the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for a national criminal history records check.
(4) In accordance with §§ 10–201 through [10–228] 10–229 of the Criminal
Procedure Article, the Central Repository shall forward the criminal history records
information of the designated representative and the immediate supervisor of the
designated representative of an applicant to the Board and the applicant.
(5) [The Board shall ensure that information] INFORMATION obtained
from the Central Repository under this subsection:
(i) Is [kept] confidential;
(ii) [Is] MAY not BE redisseminated; and
(iii) [Is] MAY BE used only for the permitting purpose authorized by
this subtitle.
(6) The subject of a criminal history records check under this subsection
may contest the contents of the [printed statement] CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
INFORMATION issued by the Central Repository as provided in § 10–223 of the Criminal
Procedure Article.
(7) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO
THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
12–6C–06.
– 29 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, at least 1 month
before a wholesale distributor permit expires, the Board shall send to the wholesale
distributor permit holder a renewal notice by electronic means to the last known e–mail
address of the permit holder.
(2) If requested by a wholesale distributor permit holder, the Board shall
send to the permit holder a renewal notice by first–class mail to the last known address of
the permit holder.
(3) If a renewal notice sent by electronic means under paragraph (1) of this
subsection is returned to the Board as undeliverable, the Board shall send to the wholesale
distributor permit holder a renewal notice by first–class mail to the last known address of
the permit holder.
(4) A renewal notice sent under this subsection shall state:
(i) The date on which the current wholesale distributor permit
expires;
(ii) The date by which the renewal application must be received by
the Board for the renewal to be issued and mailed before the current wholesale distributor
permit expires; and
(iii) The amount of the renewal fee.
(5) Before a wholesale distributor permit expires, a wholesale distributor
permit holder periodically may renew it for an additional 2–year term, if the wholesale
distributor permit holder:
(i) Otherwise is entitled to a wholesale distributor permit;
(ii) Pays to the Board a renewal fee set by the Board; and
(iii) Submits to the Board a renewal application on the form that the
Board requires.
(6) (i) The renewal application form shall set forth the information that
the wholesale distributor provided under § 12–6C–05 of this subtitle.
(ii) Within 30 days after receiving the form, the wholesale
distributor shall identify and state under oath to the Board all changes or corrections to the
information that was provided under § 12–6C–05 of this subtitle.
(7) The Board shall renew the wholesale distributor permit of a wholesale
distributor permit holder who meets the requirements of this subtitle and any regulations
adopted under this subtitle.
– 30 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(8) IF A WHOLESALE DISTRIBUTOR IS LOCATED OUTSIDE THE STATE,
THE DESIGNATED REPRESENTATIVE AND IMMEDIATE SUPERVISOR OF THE
DESIGNATED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE PERMIT HOLDER SHALL SUBMIT TO A
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–6C–05.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE BEFORE THE PERMIT MAY BE RENEWED.
[(8)] (9) The Board may deny, suspend, or revoke the permit of a
wholesale distributor if the Board determines that the wholesale distributor no longer
qualifies for a permit.
12–6D–03.
(b) An applicant shall submit a request for a State AND NATIONAL criminal
history records check in accordance with § 12–6D–04 of this subtitle.
(c) The Board may not approve an application until the State AND NATIONAL
criminal history records check is completed.
12–6D–04.
(a) In this section, “Central Repository” means the Criminal Justice Information
System Central Repository of the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services.
(b) As part of an application to the Central Repository for a State AND NATIONAL
criminal history records check, the applicant shall submit to the Central Repository:
(1) [Two complete sets] A COMPLETE SET of legible fingerprints taken [on
forms] IN A FORMAT approved by the [director] DIRECTOR of the Central Repository AND
THE DIRECTOR OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION; [and]
(2) The fee authorized under § 10–221(b)(7) of the Criminal Procedure
Article for access to [State] MARYLAND criminal history records; AND
(3) THE MANDATORY PROCESSING FEE REQUIRED BY THE FEDERAL
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR A NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK.
(c) In accordance with §§ 10–201 through [10–228] 10–229 of the Criminal
Procedure Article, the Central Repository shall forward [the criminal history records
information of the applicant] to the Board and the [applicant] INDIVIDUAL THE
INDIVIDUAL’S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION.
(d) [The Board shall ensure that information] INFORMATION obtained from the
Central Repository under this [subsection] SECTION:
– 31 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) Is [kept] confidential;
(2) [Is] MAY not BE redisseminated; and
(3) [Is] MAY BE used only for the registration purpose authorized by this
subtitle.
(e) The subject of a criminal history records check under this subsection may
contest the contents of the printed statement issued by the Central Repository as provided
in § 10–223 of the Criminal Procedure Article.
(F) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO THE
CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
13–302.1.
(a) In this section, “Central Repository” means the Criminal Justice Information
System Central Repository of the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services.
(b) As part of an application to the Central Repository for a State and national
criminal history records check, an applicant shall submit to the Central Repository:
(1) [Two] A complete [sets] SET of legible fingerprints taken [on forms] IN
A FORMAT approved by the Director of the Central Repository and the Director of the
Federal Bureau of Investigation;
(2) The fee authorized under § 10–221(b)(7) of the Criminal Procedure
Article for access to [State] MARYLAND criminal history records; and
(3) The MANDATORY processing fee required by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history records check.
(c) In accordance with §§ 10–201 through [10–228] 10–229 of the Criminal
Procedure Article, the Central Repository shall forward to the Board and to the applicant
the criminal history record information of the applicant.
(d) If an applicant has made three or more unsuccessful attempts at securing
legible fingerprints, the Board may accept an alternate method of a criminal history records
check as permitted by the Director of the Central Repository and the Director of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation.
(e) Information obtained from the Central Repository under this section:
– 32 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(1) Is confidential [and may];
(2) MAY not be redisseminated; and
[(2)] (3) May be used only for the licensing purpose authorized by this
title.
(f) The subject of a criminal history records check under this section may contest
the contents of the printed statement issued by the Central Repository as provided in §
10–223 of the Criminal Procedure Article.
(G) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO THE
CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
13–311.
(E) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, THE BOARD SHALL REQUIRE ALL LICENSEES
WHO WERE INITIALLY LICENSED WITHOUT A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK
TO SUBMIT TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
13–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE ON RENEWAL AS SET FORTH IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED
BY THE BOARD.
[(e)] (F) The Board shall renew the license of each licensee who meets the
requirements of this section.
16–302.1.
(a) In this section, “Central Repository” means the Criminal Justice Information
System Central Repository of the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services.
(b) As part of an application to the Central Repository for a State and national
criminal history records check, an applicant shall submit to the Central Repository:
(1) [One] A complete set of legible fingerprints taken in a [manner]
FORMAT approved by the Director of the Central Repository and the Director of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation;
(2) The fee authorized under § 10–221(b)(7) of the Criminal Procedure
Article for access to [State] MARYLAND criminal history records; and
– 33 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) The MANDATORY processing fee required by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history records check.
(c) In accordance with §§ 10–201 through 10–229 of the Criminal Procedure
Article, the Central Repository shall forward to the Board and the applicant the criminal
history record information of the applicant.
(d) Information obtained from the Central Repository under this section:
(1) Is confidential;
(2) May not be redisseminated; and
(3) [Shall] MAY be used only for the licensing purpose authorized by this
title.
(e) The subject of a criminal history records check under this section may contest
the contents of the printed statement issued by the Central Repository as provided in §
10–223 of the Criminal Procedure Article.
(F) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO THE
CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
18–302.1.
(a) In this section, “Central Repository” means the Criminal Justice Information
System Central Repository of the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services.
(b) As part of an application to the Central Repository for a State and national
criminal history records check, an applicant shall submit to the Central Repository:
(1) [Two] A complete [sets] SET of legible fingerprints taken [on forms] IN
A FORMAT approved by the Director of the Central Repository and the Director of the
Federal Bureau of Investigation;
(2) The fee authorized under § 10–221(b)(7) of the Criminal Procedure
Article for access to [State] MARYLAND criminal history records; and
(3) The MANDATORY processing fee required by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history records check.
– 34 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(c) In accordance with §§ 10–201 through [10–228] 10–229 of the Criminal
Procedure Article, the Central Repository shall forward to the Board and the applicant the
criminal history record information of the applicant.
(d) If an applicant has made three or more unsuccessful attempts at securing
legible fingerprints, the Board may accept an alternate method of a criminal history records
check as allowed by the Director of the Central Repository and the Director of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation.
(e) Information obtained from the Central Repository under this section:
(1) [Shall be] IS confidential;
(2) May not be redisseminated; and
(3) [Shall] MAY be used only for the licensing purpose authorized by this
title.
(f) The subject of a criminal history records check under this section may contest
the contents of the printed statement issued by the Central Repository as provided in §
10–223 of the Criminal Procedure Article.
(G) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO THE
CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
18–309.
[(h) (1) (i) Beginning March 2019, the Board shall begin a process requiring
criminal history records checks in accordance with § 18–302.1 of this subtitle on:
1. Selected annual renewal applicants as determined by
regulations adopted by the Board; and
2. Each former licensee or registrant who files for
reinstatement under § 18–310 of this subtitle after failing to renew the license or
registration for a period of 1 year or more.
(ii) An additional criminal history records check shall be performed:
1. 6 years after a renewal applicant submitted to a criminal
history records check under § 18–302(e) of this subtitle; and
– 35 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
2. Every 6 years after a renewal applicant was required to
submit to a criminal history records check under subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph.
(2) On receipt of the criminal history record information of a licensee
forwarded to the Board in accordance with § 18–302.1 of this subtitle, in determining
whether to renew a license or registration, the Board shall consider:
(i) The age at which the crime was committed;
(ii) The circumstances surrounding the crime;
(iii) The length of time that has passed since the crime;
(iv) Subsequent work history;
(v) Employment and character references; and
(vi) Other evidence that demonstrates whether the licensee poses a
threat to the public health or safety.
(3) The Board may not renew a license or registration if the criminal
history record information required under § 18–302.1 of this subtitle has not been received.]
20–303.
(b) (1) As part of the application for a criminal history records check, the
applicant shall submit to the Central Repository:
(i) A COMPLETE SET OF legible [set of] fingerprints taken in a
format approved by the Director of the Central Repository and the Director of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation;
(ii) The fee authorized under § 10–221(b)(7) of the Criminal
Procedure Article for access to [State] MARYLAND criminal history records; and
(iii) The MANDATORY processing fee required by the Federal Bureau
of Investigation for a national criminal history records check.
(2) In accordance with §§ 10–201 through [10–228] 10–229 of the Criminal
Procedure Article, the Central Repository shall forward to the applicant and the Board the
applicant’s criminal history records information.
(3) Information obtained from the Central Repository under this
subsection:
– 36 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(i) Is confidential [and may];
(II) MAY not be redisseminated; and
[(ii)] (III) May be used only for the certification purpose authorized
by this subtitle.
(4) The subject of a criminal history records check under this subsection
may contest the contents of the printed statement issued by the Central Repository as
provided in § 10–223 of the Criminal Procedure Article.
(5) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO
THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
21–302.
To obtain a license, an applicant shall demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Board
that the applicant:
(1) Is at least 18 years old;
(2) Is of good moral character;
(3) Has satisfied the education and experience requirements to qualify for
examination under § 21–304 of this subtitle; [and]
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this title, has successfully passed an
examination as required by the Board; AND
(5) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, HAS SUBMITTED TO A CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
21–302.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CENTRAL REPOSITORY” MEANS THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE INFORMATION SYSTEM CENTRAL REPOSITORY OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
PUBLIC SAFETY AND CORRECTIONAL SERVICES.
(B) AN APPLICANT SHALL APPLY TO THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY FOR A
STATE AND NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK.
– 37 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(C) AS PART OF THE APPLICATION FOR A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS
CHECK, AN APPLICANT SHALL COMPLETE AND SUBMIT TO THE CENTRAL
REPOSITORY:
(1) A COMPLETE SET OF LEGIBLE FINGERPRINTS TAKEN IN A FORMAT
APPROVED BY THE DIRECTOR OF THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AND THE DIRECTOR
OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION;
(2) THE FEE AUTHORIZED UNDER § 10–221(B)(7) OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE FOR ACCESS TO MARYLAND CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS;
AND
(3) THE MANDATORY PROCESSING FEE REQUIRED BY THE FEDERAL
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR A NATIONAL CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK.
(D) IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 10–201 THROUGH 10–229 OF THE CRIMINAL
PROCEDURE ARTICLE, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL FORWARD TO THE
BOARD AND THE INDIVIDUAL THE INDIVIDUAL’S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION.
(E) INFORMATION OBTAINED FROM THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY UNDER
THIS SECTION:
(1) IS CONFIDENTIAL;
(2) MAY NOT BE REDISSEMINATED; AND
(3) MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE LICENSING PURPOSE AUTHORIZED
BY THIS TITLE.
(F) THE SUBJECT OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY CONTEST THE CONTENTS OF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
INFORMATION ISSUED BY THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY AS PROVIDED IN § 10–223 OF
THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE.
(G) IF CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION IS REPORTED TO THE
CENTRAL REPOSITORY AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORDS CHECK, THE CENTRAL REPOSITORY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE BOARD AND
THE INDIVIDUAL REVISED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION FOR THE
INDIVIDUAL.
21–307.
– 38 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 371
(a) The Board shall license and issue the appropriate licensure to any applicant
who meets the requirements of this title.
(b) The Board shall include on each license that it issues:
(1) The designation “licensed environmental health specialist”;
(2) The name of the license holder;
(3) The date of issue and serial number of the license;
(4) The Board seal; and
(5) The signature of the Board’s representative.
(c) The Board shall issue a new license to replace a lost, destroyed, or mutilated
license if the license holder pays a fee that is set by the Board.
(D) THE BOARD MAY NOT ISSUE A LICENSE IF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORD INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER § 21–302 OF THIS TITLE HAS NOT BEEN
RECEIVED.
21–309.
(c) Before the license expires, the licensee may renew it for an additional 2–year
term, if the licensee:
(1) Otherwise is entitled to be licensed;
(2) Pays to the Board the renewal fee set by the Board;
(3) Submits to the Board a renewal application on the form that the Board
requires; [and]
(4) Submits to the Board proof that during the previous 2–year period, the
licensee has acquired 20 hours of approved training in environmental health or other
equivalent education as approved by the Board; AND
(5) IF LICENSED BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, SUBMITS SATISFACTORY
EVIDENCE OF SUBMITTING TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR THE LICENSEE’S FIRST
RENEWAL AFTER JULY 1, 2027.
21–310.
– 39 –

Ch. 371 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(D) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, A LICENSED ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH
SPECIALIST APPLYING FOR THE REACTIVATION OF AN INACTIVE OR NONRENEWED
LICENSE SHALL SUBMIT SATISFACTORY EVIDENCE OF SUBMITTING TO A CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) THE BOARD MAY NOT REACTIVATE A LICENSE IF THE CRIMINAL
HISTORY RECORD INFORMATION HAS NOT BEEN RECEIVED.
21–315.
(A) The Board, on the affirmative vote of a majority of its full appointed
membership, may reinstate the license of an individual whose license has been revoked.
(B) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2027, AN INDIVIDUAL APPLYING FOR
REINSTATEMENT OF A REVOKED LICENSE SHALL SUBMIT SATISFACTORY EVIDENCE
OF SUBMITTING TO A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORDS CHECK IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
21–302.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) THE BOARD MAY NOT REINSTATE A LICENSE IF THE CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORD INFORMATION HAS NOT BEEN RECEIVED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 40 –